guesser/bezhta.guess.lexd
LEXICON NounRootLong
мугува:мугув[long] # лапти
хаьтӏаь:хаьтӏ[long] # тарелка
тицӏийо:тицӏий[long] # пояс
кьакъало:кьакъал[long] # шапка

LEXICON SuppletiveRoot
сукӏо:аьдаьмлаь
сукӏо:сукӏабо
шуьгоь:шуьгōьл
